Utah statutes.
35A-3-606.   Docketing abstract of final administrative order -- Real property and personal property liens -- Effect of order -- Execution.

(1) (a)  An abstract of a final administrative order may be docketed in the district court of any county in the state.

(b)  The time of receipt of the abstract shall be noted by the clerk on the abstract and entered in the docket.

(2)  From the time the abstract is docketed in the judgment docket of a district court, any administrative judgment included in the order abstracted constitutes a lien upon the real property of the obligor situated in that county for a period of eight years from the date the order is entered unless previously satisfied.

(3)  The final administrative order fixing the liability of the obligor shall have the same effect as any other money judgment entered in a district court.

(4)  Attachment, garnishment, or execution on a judgment included in or accruing under an administrative order filed and docketed under this section shall be in the same manner and with the same effect as an attachment, garnishment, or execution on a judgment of a district court, except that a writ of garnishment on earnings shall continue to operate and require the garnishee to withhold the nonexempt portion of the earnings at each succeeding earnings disbursement interval until released in writing by the department or by court order.

(5)  The lien and enforcement remedies provided by this section are in addition to any other lien or remedy provided by law.

